Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.050

Petition to establish—Beds limited.

When it is proposed to establish such hospital, a petition shall be presented to the county legislative authority, signed by three hundred or more resident taxpayers of the county, requesting the county legislative authority to submit to the electors the proposition to issue bonds for the purpose of procuring a site, and erecting, equipping, and maintaining such hospital, and specifying the amount of bonds proposed to be issued for that purpose and the number of hospital beds.

[ 1984 c 26 s 3; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.050. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 174 s 3; RRS s 6090-3.]